Vermont, session 2025-2026, S277.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 21 V.S.A. § 388 is added to read:
§ 388. PROHIBITION ON MANDATORY OVERTIME FOR NURSES
(a) Policy. The purpose of this section is to promote patient safety, protect
the health of nurses, and improve working conditions in hospitals and long-
term care facilities for nurses providing direct patient care or clinical services
to patients by prohibiting mandatory overtime.
(b) Definitions. As used in this section:
(1) “Employer” means a hospital or a long-term care facility.
(2) “Hospital” means a place devoted primarily to the maintenance and
operation of diagnostic and therapeutic facilities for inpatient medical or
VT LEG #385216 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.277
2026 Page 2 of 5
surgical care of individuals who have an illness, disease, injury, or physical
disability, or for obstetrics that is licensed or required to be licensed pursuant
to 18 V.S.A. chapter 43.
(3) “Long-term care facility” means a residential care home, nursing
home, assisted living residence, home for persons who are terminally ill, or
therapeutic community residence that is licensed or required to be licensed
pursuant to 33 V.S.A. chapter 71.
(4) “Mandatory overtime” means work that is required of a nurse by an
employer in excess of an agreed-upon, predetermined, regularly scheduled
shift, provided that in no case shall the predetermined and regularly scheduled
number of hours exceed 12 hours in any 24-hour period or 48 hours in any
workweek.
(5) “Nurse” means a registered nurse or a licensed practical nurse
required to be licensed pursuant to 26 V.S.A. chapter 28, subchapter 1, and
who receives an hourly wage and has direct responsibility to oversee or carry
out nursing care in a hospital or a long-term care facility setting.
(6) “On-call time” means time spent by a nurse who is not working but
who is compensated for being available.
(c) Prohibition on mandatory overtime. No nurse shall be required to work
mandatory overtime. A nurse may not be disciplined for refusing to work in
excess of an agreed-upon, predetermined, regularly scheduled shift but may be
VT LEG #385216 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.277
2026 Page 3 of 5
disciplined for refusing to work mandatory overtime if any of the exceptions to
the prohibition on mandatory overtime pursuant to subsection (d) of this
section apply.
(d) Exceptions to prohibition on mandatory overtime. Notwithstanding
subsection (c) of this section, the prohibition against mandatory overtime shall
not apply if:
(1) a federal, State, or local state of emergency has been declared;
(2) the nurse is actively engaged in an ongoing medical or surgical
procedure and the continued presence of the nurse through the completion of
the procedure is necessary to the health and safety of the patient; or
(3) an unforeseen disaster or other catastrophic event occurs that
substantially affects or increases the need for health care services. An
unforeseen disaster or catastrophic event is one that does not occur regularly,
increases the need for nurses to provide safe patient care, and could not be
prudently anticipated by the employer. It does not include situations in which
the employer fails to have sufficient nursing staff to meet the usual and
predictable nursing needs of its patients.
(e) Good faith effort required. If an employer determines that an exception
exists pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, the employer shall make a
good faith effort to meet the staffing need through voluntary overtime or
calling per diems and agency nurses before requiring mandatory overtime.
VT LEG #385216 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.277
2026 Page 4 of 5
(f) On call time. The provisions of this section shall not apply to on-call
time, but an employer may not use on-call time as a substitute for mandatory
overtime.
(g) Voluntary overtime. A nurse may voluntarily agree to work overtime.
(h) Off duty. Any nurse who works more than 12 consecutive hours, as
permitted by this section, must be allowed at least 10 consecutive hours off-
duty immediately following the worked overtime.
(i) Collective bargaining agreements. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to limit, alter, or modify the terms, conditions, or provisions of a
collective bargaining agreement entered into between an employer and a labor
organization representing nurses.
Sec. 2. 21 V.S.A. § 389 is added to read:
§ 389. REPORT ON MANDATORY OVERTIME FOR NURSES; NOTICE
(a) Employers shall report all instances of mandatory overtime and the
circumstances requiring its use to the Vermont Department of Health within 30
days after occurrence. The report shall be in writing and shall include:
(1) an explanation for the use of mandatory overtime and identification
of any applicable exception to the prohibition on mandatory overtime pursuant
to subsection 388(d) of this subchapter; and
VT LEG #385216 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.277
2026 Page 5 of 5
(2) the good faith efforts the employer undertook to meet the staffing
need, pursuant to subsection 388(e) of this subchapter, before requiring
mandatory overtime.
(b) Reports shall be subject to inspection and copying pursuant to 1 V.S.A.
chapter 5, subchapter 3. Any personally identifiable information about nurses
or patients shall be redacted from the reports prior to inspection and copying.
(c) Employers shall post and maintain in a conspicuous place in each of the
employer’s places of business a printed notice of the provisions of section 388
of this subchapter.
Sec. 3. 21 V.S.A. § 390 is added to read:
§ 390. INVESTIGATION OF COMPLAINTS; PENALTIES
(a) The Commissioner of Labor shall have the power and authority as set
forth in section 385 of this subchapter to investigate complaints brought
pursuant to section 388 of this subchapter.
(b) An employer who is determined to have violated section 388 of this
subchapter shall be fined $1,000.00 for the first violation, $1,500.00 for the
second violation, and $2,000.00 for the third and any subsequent violations.
(c) An employer who fails to comply with section 389 of this subchapter
shall be fined $500.00 per violation.
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #385216 v.2